Massachusetts, session 194th, H2700.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (g) of section 26 of chapter 90B of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “chapter
131”, in line 71, the following: “, or to any person licensed under section 131 or 131F of chapter
140”.
of 1